Connecticut, session 2026, HB05139.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 That title 12 of the general statutes be amended to establish (1) an
2 estate tax recapture for estates that exceed the fifteen-million-dollar
LCO No. 939 1 of 2

Proposed Bill No. 5139
3 limit on estate tax liability, and (2) an alternative minimum estate tax to
4 prevent the effective net tax rate from falling below two per cent.